Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.150

Failure or impossibility to act.

(1) If an arbitrator becomes de jure or de facto unable to perform the arbitrator's functions or for other reasons fails to act without undue delay, the arbitrator's mandate terminates if the arbitrator withdraws from the arbitrator's office or if the parties agree on the termination. Otherwise, if a controversy remains concerning any of these grounds, any party may request the court specified in RCW 7.05.070 to decide on the termination of the mandate, which decision shall be subject to no appeal.

(2) If, under this section or RCW 7.05.140(2), an arbitrator withdraws from the arbitrator's office or a party agrees to the termination of the mandate of an arbitrator, this does not imply acceptance of the validity of any ground referred to in this section or RCW 7.05.130(2).

[ 2015 c 276 s 15.]